Hawaii statutes.
[§206M-19] Court proceedings; preferences.
Any action or proceeding to which the development corporation, the State, or a
county may be party, in which any question arises as to the validity of this
chapter, shall be preferred over all other civil causes, except election cases,
without respect to position on the calendar. The same preference shall be
given upon application of counsel for the development corporation in any action
or proceeding questioning the validity of this chapter in which the development
corporation has duly intervened. [L 1983, c 152, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next